District of Columbia statutes.
9-1203.01

Track extensions for development of Buzzards Point authorized.

The Philadelphia, Baltimore and Washington Railroad Company is hereby authorized to establish a switch connection with an existing track in its New Jersey Avenue yard, at a point north of the north curb line of I Street Southeast; thence southward on 1st Street Southeast to and connecting with the existing track on 1st Street Southeast at or about N Street, with a switch connection at or about Quander Street and spur track running over, across, and through square 743 to and into the United States Navy Yard; thence southward on 1st Street Southeast to and thence along Potomac Avenue to the west line of 2nd Street Southwest, with all necessary switches, extensions, turnouts, and sidings and such other track extensions through and along One-half Street Southwest, and 2nd Street Southwest, south of Potomac Avenue and north of Potomac Avenue to P Street, and One-half Street Southeast, south of Potomac Avenue and north of Potomac Avenue to O Street, as may be or become necessary for the establishment of adequate railroad facilities in connection with the development of Buzzards Point as an industrial area in the District of Columbia.

June 18, 1932, 47 Stat. 322, ch. 269, § 1
June 20, 1939, 53 Stat. 849, ch. 229
June 5, 1942, 56 Stat. 326, ch. 353
Public utilities, multiple company use of utility infrastructures, see § 34-1102.
Real property assessment and tax, property owned or occupied by railroad companies, see §§ 47-836 and 47-837.
This section is referenced in § 9-1203.04.
1981 Ed., § 7-1416.
1973 Ed., § 7-1216.